Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB675.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 2301-A of the act of April 9, 1929 (P.L.177, No.175), known as The Administrative Code of 1929, is amended by adding a paragraph to read:Section 2301-A. Powers and duties.1234567891011121314151617181920212223242526272829 The Department of Drug and Alcohol Programs shall have the power and its duty shall be:* * *(8.3) To require inpatient treatment facilities to:(i) Develop a discharge transportation plan with the patient's admission or within 72 hours of admission. The discharge transportation plan shall:(A) Provide details of the transportation of the patient from the facility to an initial destination following the patient's discharge.(B) Be contained in the patient's chart and adhered to on voluntary or involuntary discharge.(C) Include the names of up to three individuals who are authorized to pick up the patient or a public or third-party transportation service and the initial address of drop-off after discharge.(ii) Prohibit the release of a patient who does not have a discharge transportation plan.* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0675PN0767 - 2 - 1234567891011121314151617181920